el: Σχεδιασμός ανδρείκελου πάλης: Εδάφους (grappling); Σάκος εδάφους; Κρεμαστό; Γονατιστό; Καθιστό; Όρθιο; Σάκος ρίψεων; Ανθρώπινο σχήμα με δύο πόδια; Ομοίωμα άνω κορμού; Άλλο
sv: Brottningsdocka – design: Mark (grappling); Marksäck; Hängande; Knästående; Sittande; Stående; Kastsäck; Tvåbent mänsklig form; Överkroppsdocka; Övrigt
nb: Utforming av brytedukke: Bakke (grappling); Bakkepose; Hengende; Knelende; Sittende; Stående; Kastepose; Tobeint menneskeform; Overkroppsdukke; Annet
fi: Paininuken rakenne: Matto (lukkopaini); Mattosäkki; Riippuva; Polvillaan oleva; Istuva; Seisova; Heittosäkki; Kaksijalkainen ihmisen muotoinen; Ylävartalonukke; Muu
zh-CN: 摔跤假人设计: 地面（缠斗）; 地面沙袋; 悬挂式; 跪姿; 坐姿; 站姿; 投掷沙袋; 双腿人形; 上半身假人; 其他
fr: Forme du mannequin de lutte: Au sol (grappling); Sac de frappe au sol; Suspendu; À genoux; Assis; Debout; Sac de projection; Forme humaine à deux jambes; Mannequin haut du corps; Autre
pt-PT: Design do boneco de wrestling: Solo (luta corpo a corpo); Saco de solo; Suspenso; Ajoelhado; Sentado; De pé; Saco de arremesso; Forma humana com duas pernas; Boneco de tronco; Outro
es: Diseño del maniquí de lucha libre: Suelo (grappling); Saco de suelo; Colgante; De rodillas; Sentado; De pie; Saco de lanzamiento; Forma humana de dos piernas; Maniquí de la parte superior del cuerpo; Otro
en: Wrestling dummy design: Ground (grappling); Ground bag; Hanging; Kneeling; Sitting; Standing; Throwing bag; Two-legged human shape; Upper-body dummy; Other
da: Design af brydedummy: Gulv (grappling); Gulvsæk; Hængende; Knælende; Siddende; Stående; Kastesæk; Tobenet menneskeform; Overkropsdukke; Andet
tr: Güreş mankeni tasarımı: Yer (grappling); Yer torbası; Asılan; Diz çöken; Oturan; Ayakta duran; Fırlatma torbası; İki bacaklı insan figürü; Üst gövde mankeni; Diğer
ro-RO: Designul manechinului de lupte: Pentru sol (grappling); Sac pentru sol; Suspendat; În genunchi; Așezat; În picioare; Sac pentru aruncare; Formă umană cu două picioare; Manechin pentru partea superioară a corpului; Altele
ru: Конструкция тренировочного манекена: Для партера (грепплинг); Мешок для партера; Подвесной; Стоящий на коленях; Сидящий; Стоящий; Мешок для бросков; Двуногая человеческая фигура; Манекен для верхней части тела; Другое
nl: ontwerp van een worstelpop: Grond (grappling); Grondzak; Hangend; Knielend; Zittend; Staand; Werpzak; Tweebenige menselijke vorm; Bovenlichaamdummy; Overig
zh-TW: 摔角假人設計: 地面 (纏鬥); 地面沙包; 懸掛; 跪姿; 坐姿; 站姿; 投擲沙包; 雙腿人形; 上半身假人; 其他
vi: Thiết kế hình nộm đấu vật: Tập địa chiến (vật); Bao đấm tập địa chiến; Treo; Quỳ; Ngồi; Đứng; Bao tập ném; Hình người hai chân; Hình nộm nửa thân trên; Khác
sl-SI: Zasnova lutke za rokoborbo: Parter (grappling); Vreča za parter; Viseče; Klečeče; Sedeče; Stoječe; Vreča za mete; Dvonožna človeška oblika; Lutka za zgornji del telesa; Drugo
ko: 레슬링 더미 디자인: 그라운드(그래플링); 그라운드 백; 매달기형; 무릎 꿇은 자세; 앉은 자세; 서 있는 자세; 스로잉 백; 양다리 인물형; 상체 더미; 기타
it: Design del manichino da wrestling: A terra (grappling); Sacco da terra; Sospeso; In ginocchio; Seduto; In piedi; Sacco per proiezioni; Forma umana a due gambe; Manichino mezzo busto; Altro
ja: レスリングダミーのデザイン: グラウンド (グラップリング); グラウンドバッグ; 吊り下げ式; 膝立ち; 座り; 立ち; スローイングバッグ; 2 本足の人型; 上半身ダミー; その他
hu: Birkózóbábu kialakítása: Földi (földharc); Földi zsák; Függő; Térdelő; Ülő; Álló; Dobózsák; Kétlábú emberalak; Felsőtest-bábu; Egyéb
lt-LT: Imtynių manekeno dizainas: Parteriui (imtynėms); Maišas parteriui; Pakabinamas; Klūpimas; Sėdintis; Stovintis; Metimų maišas; Dvikojis, žmogaus formos; Viršutinės kūno dalies manekenas; Kita
de: Bauart der Wrestlingpuppe: Boden (Grappling); Boden-Sack; Hängend; Kniend; Sitzend; Stehend; Wurfsack; Zweibeinige Menschenform; Oberkörper-Dummy; Sonstige
pl: Konstrukcja manekina zapaśniczego: Parter (grappling); Worek do parteru; Wiszący; Klęczący; Siedzący; Stojący; Worek do rzutów; Dwunożna sylwetka ludzka; Manekin (górna połowa ciała); Inne
cs: Provedení zápasnické figuríny: Pro boj na zemi (grappling); Zemní pytel; Závěsný; Klečící; Sedící; Stojící; Vrhací pytel; Lidská postava se dvěma nohama; Figurína horní části těla; Jiné
hr-HR: Dizajn lutke za hrvanje: Parter (grappling); Vreća za parter; Viseća; Klečeća; Sjedeća; Stojeća; Vreća za bacanje; Ljudski oblik s dvije noge; Lutka gornjeg dijela tijela; Ostalo
bg-BG: Дизайн на тренировъчен манекен за борба: Земя (граплинг); Наземен чувал; Висящ; На колене; Седящ; Стоящ; Чувал за хвърляне; Двукрака човешка форма; Манекен тип торс; Други
pt-BR: Boneco de treino de luta design: Chão (luta agarrada); Saco de chão; Suspenso; Ajoelhado; Sentado; Em pé; Saco de arremesso; Formato humano com duas pernas; Boneco para a parte superior do corpo; Outros
sk-SK: Dizajn zápasníckej figuríny: Na zem (grappling); Vrece na zem; Závesné; Kľačiace; Sediace; Stojace; Vrece na hádzanie; Dvojnohý ľudský tvar; Figurína hornej časti tela; Iné
th: การออกแบบหุ่นฝึกซ้อมมวยปล้ำ: สำหรับท่านอน (จับล็อก); กระสอบนอน; แบบแขวน; ท่าคุกเข่า; ท่านั่ง; ท่ายืน; กระสอบทุ่ม; รูปคนสองขา; หุ่นท่อนบน; อื่นๆ